California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 registration, or in lieu of suspension or revocation, impose a moratorium on adding or soliciting additional customers. Any suspension or revocation of a registration shall require the electric service provider to cease serving customers within the boundaries of electrical corporations, and the affected customers shall be served by the electrical corporation until the time when they may select service from another service provider. Customers shall not be liable for the payment of any early termination fees or other penalties to any electric service provider under the service agreement if the serving electric service provider’s registration is suspended or revoked.

(d) The commission shall require any electric service provider whose registration is revoked pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) to refund all of the customer credit funds that the electric service provider received from the Energy Commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 25744 of the Public Resources Code. The repayment of these funds shall be in addition to all other penalties and fines appropriately assessed against the electric service provider for committing those acts under other provisions of law. All customer credit funds refunded under this subdivision shall be deposited in the Renewable Resource Trust Fund for redistribution by the Energy Commission pursuant to Chapter 8.6 (commencing with Section 25740) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code. This subdivision may not be construed to apply retroactively.

(e) If a customer of an electric service provider or a community choice aggregator is involuntarily returned to service provided by an electrical corporation, any reentry fee imposed on that customer that the commission deems is necessary to avoid imposing costs on other customers of the electrical corporation shall be the obligation of the electric service provider or a community choice
 aggregator, except in the case of a customer returned due to default in payment or other contractual obligations or because the customer’s contract has expired. As a condition of its registration, an electric service provider or a community choice aggregator shall post a bond or demonstrate insurance sufficient to cover those reentry fees. In the event that an electric service provider becomes insolvent and is unable to discharge its obligation to pay reentry fees, the fees shall be allocated to the returning customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 21.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

394.27.

When a customer files a claim with an electrical corporation for damages to property resulting from the curtailment of electric service due to the failure of the electrical corporation to reasonably provide service or restore service within a reasonable time after a fire, flood, earthquake, other natural disaster, or act of God, the electric corporation shall inform the customer that such claim may be pursued in small claims court or other judicial courts, depending on the amount of the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 17.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

394.3.

To carry out essential elements of a sustainable and effective consumer protection program in connection with electric service providers offering electrical service to residential and small commercial customers as intended by the Legislature in this article, the following shall apply:

(a) The commission shall collect a registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100) from electric service providers required to register under this article, and deposit the fee proceeds in the Public Utilities Reimbursement Account established under Section 402.

(b) The commission shall annually determine the costs of administering the registration program and
 other facets of consumer protection directly related to the direct access transactions of electric service providers. The commission shall collect only those costs not already being collected elsewhere. A registrant who fails to submit to the commission a required fee or a piece of information upon which fees are calculated within 30 days of billing shall be subject to a 15-percent penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

394.4.

Rules that implement the following minimum standards shall be adopted by the commission for electric service providers offering electrical services to residential and small commercial customers and the governing body of a public agency offering electrical services to residential and small commercial customers within its jurisdiction:

(a) Confidentiality: Customer information shall be confidential unless the customer consents in writing. This shall encompass confidentiality of customer specific billing, credit, or usage information. This requirement shall not extend to disclosure of generic information regarding the usage, load shape, or other general characteristics of a group or rate classification, unless the release of that information would reveal customer specific information because of the size of the group, rate classification, or nature of the information.

(b) Physical disconnects and reconnects: Only an electrical corporation, or a publicly owned electric utility, that provides physical delivery service to the affected customer shall have the authority to physically disconnect or reconnect a customer from the transmission or distribution grid. Physical disconnection by electrical corporations subject to the commission’s jurisdiction shall occur only in accordance with protocols established by the commission. Physical disconnection by publicly owned electric utilities shall occur only in accordance with protocols established by the governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility.

(c) Change in providers: Upon adequate notice supplied by a electric service provider to the electric corporation or local publicly owned electric utility providing physical delivery service, customers who are eligible for direct access may change their energy supplier. Energy suppliers may charge for this change, provided that any fee or penalty charged by the supplier associated with early termination of service, shall be disclosed in that contract or applicable tariff.

(d) Written notices: Notices describing the terms and conditions of service as described in Section 394.5, service agreements, notices of late payment, notices of discontinuance of service, and disconnection notices addressed to residential and small commercial customers shall be easily understandable, and shall be provided in the language in which the electric service provider offered the services.

(e) Billing: All bills shall have a standard bill format, as determined by the commission or the governing body, and shall contain sufficient detail for the customer to recalculate the bill for accuracy. Any late fees shall be separately stated. Each electric service provider shall provide on all customer bills a phone number by which customers may contact the electric service provider to report and resolve billing inquiries and complaints. An electric service provider contacted by a customer regarding a billing dispute shall advise the customer at the time of the initial contact that the customer may file a complaint with the commission if its dispute is not satisfactorily resolved by the electric service provider.

(f) Meter integrity: An electric customer shall have a reasonable opportunity to have its meter tested to ensure the reasonable accuracy of the meter. The commission or governing body shall determine who is responsible for the cost of that testing.

(g) Customer deposits: Electric service providers may require customer deposits before commencing service, but in no event shall the deposit be more than the estimated bill for the customer for a three-month period.

(h) Additional protections: The commission or the governing body may adopt additional residential and small commercial consumer protection standards that are in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

394.5.

(a) Except for an electrical corporation as defined in Section 218, or a local publicly owned electric utility offering electrical service to residential and small commercial customers within its service territory, each electric service provider offering electrical service to residential and small commercial customers shall, prior to the commencement of service, provide the potential customer with a written notice of the service describing the price, terms, and conditions of the service. A notice shall include all of the following:

(1) A clear description of the price, terms, and conditions of service, including:

(A) The price of electricity expressed in a format that makes it possible for residential and small commercial customers to compare and select among similar products and services on a standard basis. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this subdivision. The commission shall require disclosure of the total price of electricity on a cents-per-kilowatthour basis, including the costs of all electric services and charges regulated by the commission. The commission shall also require estimates of the total monthly bill for the electric service at varying consumption levels, including the costs of all electric services and charges regulated by the commission. In determining these rules, the commission may consider alternatives to the cents-per-kilowatthour disclosure if other information would provide the customer with sufficient information to compare among alternatives on a standard basis.

(B) Separate disclosure of all
 recurring and nonrecurring charges associated with the sale of electricity.

(C) If services other than electricity are offered, an itemization of the services and the charge or charges associated with each.

(2) An explanation of the applicability and amount of the competition transition charge, as determined pursuant to Sections 367 to 376, inclusive.

(3) A description of the potential customer’s right to rescind the contract without fee or penalty as described in Section 395.

(4) An explanation of the customer’s financial obligations, as well as the procedures regarding past due payments, discontinuance of service, billing disputes, and service complaints.

(5) The electric service
 provider’s registration number, if applicable.

(6) The right to change service providers upon written notice, including disclosure of any fees or penalties assessed by the supplier for early termination of a contract.

(7) A description of the availability of low-income assistance programs for qualified customers and how customers can apply for these programs.

(b) The commission may assist electric service providers in developing the notice. The commission may suggest inclusion of additional information it deems necessary for the consumer protection purposes of this section. On at least a semiannual basis, electric service providers shall provide the commission with a copy of the form of notice included in standard service plans made available to residential and small commercial customers.

(c) An electric service provider offering electric services who declines to provide those services to a consumer shall, upon request of the consumer, disclose to that consumer the reason for the denial in writing within 30 days. At the time service is denied, the electric service provider shall disclose to the consumer the right to make this request. A consumer shall have at least 30 days from the date service is denied to make the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 3.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

394.6.

For purposes of this article, service territory of a local publicly owned electric utility means within the boundaries of its service territory as it existed on December 20, 1995, or within the boundaries specified in an applicable service territory boundary agreement entered into pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 8101) of Division 4, or any other provision of law, between an electrical corporation and the affected local publicly owned electric utility, or within the boundaries specified in an applicable service territory boundary agreement between one local publicly owned electric utility and another local publicly owned electric utility. Furthermore, for purposes of this article, the boundaries of the Merced Irrigation District shall be as those boundaries existed on December 20, 1995, together with the territory of Castle Air Force Base, which was located outside of the district on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 21.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

394.7.

(a) The commission shall maintain a list of residential and small commercial customers who do not wish to be solicited by telephone, by an electric corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator for electric service, to subscribe to or change their electric service provider. The commission shall not assess a charge for inclusion of a customer on the list. The list shall be updated periodically, but no less than quarterly.

(b) The list shall include sufficient information for electric corporations, marketers, brokers, or aggregators of electric service to identify customers who do not wish to be solicited, including a customer’s address and telephone number. The list shall be made accessible electronically from the commission to any party regulated as an electric corporation or registered at the commission as an electric marketer, broker, or aggregator of electric service.

(c) An electric corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of electric service shall not solicit, by telephone, any customer on the list prepared pursuant to subdivision (a). Any electric corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of electric service, or the representative of an electric corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of electric service, who solicits any customer on the list prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) more than once shall be liable to the customer for twenty-five dollars ($25) for each contact in violation of this subdivision.

(d) This section shall not apply to the telephone verification required pursuant to Section 366.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 22.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

394.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, requirements placed on an electric service provider shall not apply to electrical services provided by a local publicly owned electric utility to customers within the jurisdiction or service territory of that local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 10.7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

394.9.

Unclaimed refunds ordered by the commission, and any accrued interest, may be used by the commission to fund additional consumer protection efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 24.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

395.

(a) In addition to any other right to revoke an offer, residential and small commercial customers of electrical service, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 331, have the right to cancel a contract for electric service until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase.

(b) Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address specified in the agreement or offer.

(c) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when deposited in the mail properly addressed with postage prepaid.

(d) Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take the particular form as provided with the contract or offer to purchase and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

(a) A consumer damaged by a violation of this article by an electric service provider is entitled to recover all of the following:

(1) Actual damages.

(2) The consumer’s reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

(3) Exemplary damages, in the amount the court deems proper, for intentional or willful violations.

(4) Equitable relief as the court deems proper.

(b) The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this article are in addition to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under any other law.

(c) Nothing in this article shall abrogate any authority of the Attorney General to enforce existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 315.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

396.5.

The governing body of a community choice aggregator shall adopt a policy that expressly prohibits the dissemination by the community choice aggregator of any statement relating to the community choice aggregator’s rates or terms and conditions of service that is untrue or misleading, and that is known, or that, by the exercise of reasonable care, should be known, to be untrue or misleading.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 599, Sec. 9.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Allocation of Electrical System Costs [397. - 397.]

397.

(a) (1) The commission shall, in an existing or a new proceeding, develop methodologies for allocating electrical system integration resource procurement needs to each load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, based on the contribution of the load-serving entity’s load and resource portfolio to the electrical system conditions that created the need for the procurement and for determining any costs resulting from a failure of a load-serving entity to satisfy its allocated procurement needs. Those needs and costs shall be limited to those that are subject to the commission’s jurisdiction pursuant to Section 380, 454.51, or 454.52.

(2) The electrical system integration resource procurement
 needs and costs described in paragraph (1) shall include, but are not limited to, those relating to the following:

(A) Resource adequacy requirements associated with system flexibility, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 380.

(B) Integration resources identified as needed, or proposed in response to system operational needs identified, through the process described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.51.

(b) The commission shall use the methodologies developed pursuant to subdivision (a) in allocating electrical system integration resource procurement needs and any costs resulting from a failure to procure resources to satisfy those allocated procurement needs pursuant to Section 380, 454.51,
 or 454.52.

(c) For purposes of this section, “electrical system integration resources” means resources that provide certain electrical system integration functions, benefits, or attributes, such as flexible ramping capability. 

(d) This section does not require the procurement of a specific resource or technology type.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1584)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Disclosure of Sources of Electrical Generation [398.1. - 398.6.]

398.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a need for reliable, accurate, timely, and consistent information regarding fuel sources for electric generation offered for retail sale in California.

(b) The purpose of this article is to establish a program under which entities offering electric services in California disclose accurate, reliable, and simple to understand information on the sources of energy, and the associated emissions of greenhouse gases, that are used to provide electric services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (AB 1110)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

398.2.

The definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Greenhouse gas emissions intensity” means the sum of all annual emissions of greenhouse gases associated with a generation source divided by the annual production of electricity from the generation source.

(b) “Retail supplier” means an entity that offers an electricity product for sale to retail consumers in California, including an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, electric service provider, and community choice aggregator.

(c) “System operator” means the Independent System Operator with
 responsibility for the efficient use and reliable operation of the transmission grid, as provided by Section 345, or a local publicly owned electric utility that does not utilize the Independent System Operator.

(d) “Purchases of electricity from specified sources” or “purchases from specified sources” means electricity transactions that are traceable to specific generation sources by any auditable contract trail or equivalent, such as a tradable commodity system, that provides commercial verification that the electricity source claimed has been sold once and only once to a retail consumer. Retail suppliers may rely on annual data to determine whether a transaction meets this definition, rather than hour-by-hour matching of loads and resources.

(e) “Electricity from unspecified sources” means electricity that is not traceable to specific generation sources by any auditable
 contract trail or equivalent, including a tradable commodity system, that provides commercial verification that the electricity source claimed has been sold once, and only once, to a retail consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   (AB 1110)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

398.3.

(a) Beginning January 1, 1998, or as soon as practicable thereafter, each generator that provides meter data to a system operator shall report to the system operator electricity generated in kilowatthours by hour by generator, the fuel type or fuel types and fuel consumption by fuel type by month on an historical recorded quarterly basis. Facilities using only one fuel type may satisfy this requirement by reporting fuel type only. With regard to any facility using more than one fuel type, reports shall reflect the fuel consumed as a percentage of electricity generation.

(b) The Energy Commission shall have authorization to access the electricity
 generation data in kilowatthours by hour for each facility that provides meter data to the system operator, and the fuel type or fuel types.

(c) With regard to out-of-state generation, the Energy Commission shall have authorization to access the electricity generation data in kilowatthours by hour at the point at which out-of-state generation is metered, to the extent the information has been submitted to a system operator.

(d) Trade secrets as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code contained in the information provided to the system operators pursuant to this section shall be treated as confidential. These data may be disclosed only by the system operators and only by authorization of the generator except that the Energy Commission shall have authorization
 to access these data, shall consider all these data to be trade secrets, and shall only release these data in an aggregated form such that trade secrets cannot be discerned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 6.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

398.4.

(a) Every retail supplier that makes an offering to sell electricity that is consumed in California shall disclose its electricity sources and the associated greenhouse gases emissions intensity for the previous calendar year.

(b) The disclosures required by this section shall be made to potential end-use consumers in all product-specific written promotional materials that are distributed to consumers by either printed or electronic means, including the retail supplier’s internet website, if one exists, except that advertisements and notices in general circulation media shall not be subject to this requirement.

(c) The disclosures required by this section shall be made annually to end-use consumers of
 the offered electricity. The annual disclosure shall be made on the retail supplier’s internet website by October 1 of each year, and in written promotional materials by the end of the first complete billing cycle for the fourth quarter of the year, and shall be consistent with information provided to the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 398.5. A retail supplier may distribute the disclosures required by this section via email to any end-use consumer that has consented to receive email in lieu of printed materials.

(d) The disclosures required by this section shall be made separately for each portfolio offering made by the retail supplier.

(e) On or before January 1, 1998, the Energy Commission shall specify guidelines for the format and means for disclosure required by Section 398.3 and this section, based on the requirements of this article and subject to public
 hearing.

(f) The costs of making the disclosures required by this section shall be considered to be generation related.

(g) The disclosures required by this section shall comply with the following:

(1) A retail supplier’s disclosure of its electricity sources shall be expressed as a percentage of annual sales derived from each of the following categories:

(A) Electricity from unspecified sources.

(B) Purchases of electricity from specified sources.

(2) A retail supplier’s disclosure of its electricity sources shall also separately identify total California system electricity, which is the sum of all in-state generation and
 net electricity imports by fuel type.

(h) Each of the categories specified in subdivision (g) shall be additionally identified as a percentage of annual sales that is derived from the following fuels, sources of energy, or electricity products:

(1) Coal.

(2) Large hydroelectric (greater than 30 megawatts).

(3) Natural gas.

(4) Nuclear.

(5) Eligible renewable energy resources pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11)), including any of the following:

(A) Biomass and biowaste.

(B) Geothermal.

(C) Eligible hydroelectric.

(D) Solar.

(E) Wind.

(6) Other categories as determined by the Energy Commission.

(7) The portion of annual sales derived from unbundled renewable energy credits shall be included in the disclosures in a format determined by the Energy Commission. A retail supplier may include additional information related to the sources of the unbundled renewable energy credits.

(i) All electricity sources disclosed as purchases of electricity from specified sources shall meet the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 398.2.

(j) Purchases of electricity from specified sources identified pursuant to this section shall be from sources connected to the Western Electricity Coordinating Council interconnected grid.

(k) (1) Each retail supplier shall disclose both the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of any electricity portfolio offered to its retail customers and the Energy Commission’s calculation of greenhouse gas emissions intensity associated with all statewide retail electricity sales, consistent with the requirements of this subdivision.

(2) The Energy Commission shall do all of the following:

(A) Adopt a methodology, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, for the calculation of greenhouse gas emissions intensity for each purchase of
 electricity by a retail supplier to serve its retail customers.

(B) Calculate the greenhouse gas emissions intensity associated with statewide retail electricity sales based on the greenhouse gas emissions for total California system electricity.

(C) Rely on the most recent verified greenhouse gas emissions data while ensuring that greenhouse gas emissions intensity factors for electricity from specified and unspecified sources are available to retail suppliers with sufficient advance notice to permit timely reporting.

(D) Establish guidelines for adjustments to a greenhouse gas emissions intensity factor for a reporting year for any local publicly owned electric utility demonstrating generation of quantities of electricity in previous years in excess of its total retail sales and wholesale sales from specified
 sources that do not emit any greenhouse gases. Adjustments authorized by the guidelines established by the Energy Commission shall not permit excess generation procured in a single year to be counted more than once or to be resold to another retail supplier as a specified source.

(E) Ensure that there is no double-counting of the greenhouse gas emissions or emissions attributes associated with any unit of electricity production reported by a retail supplier for any specific generating facility or unspecified source located within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council when calculating greenhouse gas emissions intensity.

(F) (i) On or before January 1, 2018, adopt guidelines, through an open process, subject to public comment, and adopted by a vote of the Energy Commission, for the reporting and disclosure of greenhouse gas emissions intensity associated
 with retail sales based on the requirements of this subdivision. Beginning June 1, 2020, retail suppliers shall be required to report data on greenhouse gas emissions intensity associated with retail sales occurring after December 31, 2018.

(ii) Any new community choice aggregator formed after January 1, 2016, shall not be required to report data on greenhouse gas emissions intensity associated with retail sales until at least 24 months, but shall be required to report that data no later than 36 months, after serving its first retail customer.

(3) Any marketing or retail product claims relating to the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of the electric supply portfolio of a retail supplier shall be consistent with the methodology adopted by the Energy Commission pursuant to this section. Retail suppliers may provide additional information to customers describing other actions
 relating to greenhouse gases that are unrelated to the electric supply portfolio.

(l) The provisions of this section shall not apply to generators providing electric service onsite, under an over-the-fence transaction as described in Section 218, or to an affiliate or affiliates, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 372.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

398.5.

(a) Retail suppliers shall annually report to the Energy Commission, for each electricity offering for the previous calendar year, each of the following:

(1) The kilowatthours purchased, by generator and fuel type during the previous calendar year, consistent with the meter data, including losses, reported to the system operator.

(2) The kilowatthours purchased from unspecified sources in California and from unspecified sources imported into California from other subregions within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council.

(3) For each electricity offering, the kilowatthours sold at
 retail.

(4) For each electricity offering, the disclosures made to consumers pursuant to Section 398.4.

(b) Information submitted to the Energy Commission pursuant to this section that is a trade secret as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code shall not be released except in an aggregated form such that trade secrets cannot be discerned.

(c) The Energy Commission shall specify guidelines and standard formats, based on the requirements of this article and subject to public hearing, for the submittal of information pursuant to this article.

(d) In developing the rules and procedures specified in this section, the Energy Commission shall seek to minimize the reporting burden and cost of reporting that it imposes on retail
 suppliers.

(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to generators providing electric service onsite, under an over-the-fence transaction as described in Section 218, or to an affiliate or affiliates, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 372.

(f) The Energy Commission may verify environmental and procurement claims made by retail suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 656, Sec. 4.   (AB 1110)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

398.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: 

(1) “Avoided greenhouse gas emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions associated with hourly purchases of electricity from specified sources that are in excess of the retail supplier’s loss-adjusted load for that hour to the extent that the excess electricity reduced the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with electricity from unspecified sources during that hour.

(2) “Electricity source type” means the fuel, source of energy, or electricity product, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 398.4.

(3) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning
 as defined in Section 380.

(4) “Loss-adjusted load” means the total amount of electricity, measured at the utility-scale generation source, that a retail supplier requires in order to provide for retail sales after electrical losses in transmission and distribution.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, every retail supplier that offers an electricity product for sale to retail customers in the state shall annually report to the Energy Commission all of the following information:

(1) The retail supplier’s sources of electricity used to serve loss-adjusted load for each hour during the previous calendar year.

(2) To the extent feasible, the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with each of those sources of electricity. In calculating those emissions of
 greenhouse gases, the retail supplier shall not include or consider any avoided greenhouse gas emissions.

(3) An annual total of greenhouse gas emissions and an annual average greenhouse gas emissions intensity, calculated as the annual total greenhouse gas emissions divided by the retail supplier’s annual total loss-adjusted load.

(4) An annual total of avoided greenhouse gas emissions. 

(c) On or before July 1, 2024, the Energy Commission shall adopt rules, through an open process, subject to public comment, and adopted by a vote of the Energy Commission, to implement the requirements of this section.

(d) The Energy Commission shall share the information collected pursuant to subdivision (b) with the commission, the State Air Resources Board, and the
 system operator, to the extent needed, for purposes of the following:

(1) Evaluating load-serving entities’ integrated resource plans pursuant to Section 454.52, as determined and deemed necessary by the Public Utilities Commission.

(2) The State Air Resources Board’s regulations for the mandatory reporting of the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(3) Estimating hourly greenhouse gas emission factors for electricity from unspecified sources, to the extent feasible.

(e) The Energy Commission shall annually publish on its internet website an aggregated summary of the data reported by each retail supplier pursuant to this section, which may include all of the following:

(1) Electricity from
 specified sources expressed as a percentage of annual loss-adjusted load that is derived from each electricity source type.

(2) Electricity from unspecified sources expressed as a percentage of annual loss-adjusted load.

(3) The total emissions of greenhouse gases associated with all electricity used to serve loss-adjusted load. In calculating those emissions of greenhouse gases, any avoided greenhouse gas emissions shall not be included or considered.

(4) The average greenhouse gas emissions intensity of all electricity used to serve loss-adjusted load.

(5) The total avoided greenhouse gas emissions. 

(f) In order to ensure that a retail supplier can obtain the information necessary to
 comply with the requirements of this section and to protect the confidentiality of market sensitive data, all of the following shall be required:

(1) All sellers of electricity from generation facilities shall timely provide each purchaser of the facility’s electricity that is subject to the reporting requirement in subdivision (b) with the purchaser’s hourly share of electricity that is scheduled into a California balancing authority and the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with that electricity.

(2) All sellers of electricity from energy storage facilities shall timely provide each purchaser of the facility’s exported electricity that is subject to the reporting requirement in subdivision (b) with the purchaser’s hourly share of exported electricity and the hourly electricity consumed by the energy storage facility in prior hours sufficient to provide the exported
 electricity after taking into account round-trip losses within the energy storage facility. If the purchaser of the facility’s exported electricity is not responsible for providing the electricity consumed by the energy storage facility in prior hours, the seller of electricity from the energy storage facility shall also provide the purchaser with the electricity source type and the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with the electricity consumed by the energy storage facility in prior hours.

(3) An entity allocating electricity from specified sources shall timely provide each retail supplier to whom a share of the electricity is allocated with the retail supplier’s hourly share of electricity from each specified source and the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with that electricity.

(4) The recipients of hourly data pursuant to this subdivision shall maintain the
 confidentiality of the data received and use it solely for the purpose of meeting the requirements of this section.

(5) The recipients of hourly data pursuant to this subdivision shall share the hourly data as necessary, and under the same confidentiality requirements, with subsequent purchasers of the electricity from specified sources.

(g) (1) The commission shall review the total annual emissions of greenhouse gases and the annual average greenhouse gas emissions intensity reported for each load-serving entity pursuant to this section and may assess whether those emissions of greenhouse gases, combined with the load-serving entity’s procurement plans for subsequent years, demonstrate adequate progress toward achieving the load-serving entity’s greenhouse gas emissions targets established pursuant to Section 454.52. The commission shall provide its findings
 for each community choice aggregator to the community choice aggregator’s governing board.
